Massachusetts, session 194th, H619.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 71 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding after section 99 the following section:-
Section 100. Any person, including but not limited to students, parents or school
personnel may possess and use a topical sunscreen product without a physician’s note or
prescription while on school property or at a school-related event or activity to avoid
overexposure to the sun if the product is regulated by the Federal Food and Drug Administration
for over-the-counter use.
For the purposes of this Section only, sunscreen is not an over-the-counter medication.
Nothing in this section requires school personnel to assist pupils in applying sunscreen.
The school district may encourage school sites to educate pupils on sun safety
precautions.
of 1